Idaho statutes. Title 59 PUBLIC OFFICERS IN GENERAL
Chapter 15
SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM

Sec.

§ 59-1501. Supplemental retirement system

Widows of governors, senators or congressmen. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 59-1502. Supplemental retirement fund. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 59-1503. Applicability. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 59-1504. Supplemental retirement system limited. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.